Arkansas, session 2025, SB564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 3-1-102(a)(5), concerning the definition of
"malt", is amended to read as follows:
(5)(A) “Malt” means liquor brewed from the fermented juices of
grain and containing more than five percent (5%) of alcohol by weight.
(B) Beer containing not more than five percent (5%) of
alcohol by weight and all other malt beverages containing not more than five
percent (5%) of alcohol by weight are not defined as “malt liquors” and are
excepted from each and every provision of this act;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 3-1-102(a), concerning definitions under
the alcoholic beverage laws, is amended to add an additional subdivision to
read as follows:
*CRH215*
03/25/2025 1:16:16 PM CRH215

SB564
(11)(A) "Malt beverage" means liquor brewed from the fermented
juices of grain and having an alcoholic content of at least five percent (5%)
but not more than twenty-one percent (21%) by weight.
(B) "Malt beverage" includes:
(i) Beer containing not more than ten percent (10%)
of alcohol by weight; and
(ii) All other malt beverages containing not more
than ten percent (10%) of alcohol by weight.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 3-5-201(a), concerning the purpose of the
beer and light wine subchapter, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The purpose of this subchapter is to legalize the manufacture and
sale within this state of beer with an alcoholic content of no more than ten
percent (10%) by weight and light wine of an alcoholic content not in excess
of five percent (5%) by weight and to so regulate the business of
manufacturing and selling such liquors as to prevent the illicit manufacture
and consumption of liquors having an alcoholic content in excess of five
percent (5%) by the legal weight, the manufacture and sale of which it is not
the purpose of this subchapter to legalize.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 3-5-202(1), concerning the definition of
"beer", is amended to read as follows:
(1)(A) “Beer” means any fermented liquor made from malt or any a
malt substitute therefor and having an alcoholic content not in excess of
five ten percent (5%) (10%) by weight.
(B) "Beer" includes malt beverages having an alcoholic
content not in excess of ten percent (10%) by weight;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 3-5-214(a)(1), concerning the oath by an
applicant for a permit for beer and light wine, is amended to read as
follows:
(1)(A) He Except as provided in subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this
section, he or she will not allow any intoxicating liquor as defined by this
subchapter of any kind or character, including beer, wine, and distilled
spirits, having an alcoholic content in excess of five percent (5%) by weight
to be kept, stored, or secreted in or upon the premises described in the
03/25/2025 1:16:16 PM CRH215

SB564
permit.
(B) He or she will not allow beer having an alcoholic
content in excess of ten percent (10%) by weight to be kept, stored, or
secreted in or upon the premises described in the permit; and

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 3-5-221(b), concerning miscellaneous
prohibited practices related to the sale of beer and light wine, is amended
to read as follows:
(b) It shall be unlawful for any brewer or distributor of light wines
or beer to manufacture or knowingly bring upon his or her premises and keep
thereon:
(1) any beer Beer of an alcoholic content in excess of ten
percent (10%) by weight;
(2) or wine Wine of an alcoholic content in excess of five
percent (5%) by weight; or
(3) any distilled Distilled spirits of any alcoholic content
whatsoever.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 3-5-221(d)(1)(D), concerning miscellaneous
prohibited practices related to beer and light wine, is amended to read as
follows:
(D) To sell, barter, furnish, or possess, or to permit
such acts to be done, in the place designated by the license or in any booth,
yard, or garden any alcoholic liquors or beverages containing in excess of
five percent (5%) of alcohol by weight or to permit any such acts to be done
beer containing in excess of ten percent (10%) of alcohol by weight;

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 3-5-227(a)(1), concerning the definition of
"beer" with regard to the regulation of beer kegs for off-premises
consumption, is amended to read as follows:
(1)(A) “Beer” means any fermented liquor made from malt or any a
malt substitute therefor and having an alcoholic content not in excess of
five ten percent (5%) (10%) by weight.
(B) "Beer" includes malt beverages having an alcoholic
content not in excess of ten percent (10%) by weight;

03/25/2025 1:16:16 PM CRH215

SB564
SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 3-5-1202(2), concerning the definition of
"beer" in the laws authorizing operation of microbrewery-restaurants, is
amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) “Beer” means any fermented liquor made from malt or any a
malt substitute therefor and having an alcoholic content not in excess of
five ten percent (5%) (10%) by weight.
(B) "Beer" includes malt beverages having an alcoholic
content not in excess of ten percent (10%) by weight;

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 3-5-1403(2), concerning the definition of
"beer" in the Arkansas Small Brewery Act, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) “Beer” means any fermented liquor made from malt or any a
malt substitute having an alcoholic content of not more than five ten percent
(5%) (10%) by weight.
(B) "Beer" includes malt beverages having an alcoholic
content not in excess of ten percent (10%) by weight;

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 3-5-1901(3), concerning the definition of
"beer" in the law authorizing microbrewery-restaurant private club permits,
is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) “Beer” means a fermented liquor made from malt or a malt
substitute and having an alcoholic content not in excess of five ten percent
(5%) (10%) by volume weight.
(B) "Beer" includes malt beverages having an alcoholic
content not in excess of ten percent (10%) by weight;

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 3-7-104(6)(A), concerning the rate of tax
levied per barrel of beer, is amended to read as follows:
(6)(A) A tax at the rate of seven dollars and fifty cents
($7.50) per barrel of thirty-two gallons (32 gals.), and proportionately for
larger and smaller gallonages per barrel, on all beer having an alcoholic
content of five ten percent (5%) (10%) or less by weight and hard cider sold
or offered for sale in the State of Arkansas.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 3-7-116(a)(2), concerning the definition
of "beer" in the law providing for a tax rebate for qualified manufacturers
03/25/2025 1:16:16 PM CRH215

SB564
of beer and malt beverage, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) “Beer” means any fermented liquor made from malt or any a
malt substitute and having an alcoholic content of not more than five ten
percent (5%) (10%) by weight.
(B) "Beer" includes malt beverages having an alcoholic
content not in excess of ten percent (10%) by weight;

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 3-8-401, concerning local option elections
for beer and light wine, is amended to add an additional subsection to read
as follows:
(g)(1) As used in this section, "beer" means any fermented liquor made
from malt or a malt substitute and having an alcoholic content of not more
than ten percent (10%) by weight.
(2) "Beer" includes malt beverages having an alcoholic content
not in excess of ten percent (10%) by weight.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 3-8-601(1), concerning the definition of
"beer" with regard to a local option election in a defunct voting district,
is amended to read as follows:
(1)(A) “Beer” means a fermented liquor made from malt or a malt
substitute and containing not more than five ten percent (5%) (10%) alcohol
by weight.
(B) "Beer" includes malt beverages having an alcoholic
content not in excess of ten percent (10%) by weight;












03/25/2025 1:16:16 PM CRH215